California statutes. Civil Code
(4) Scientific research or educational activities conducted by a public or private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution that holds an assurance with the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to the extent that the scientific research and educational activities conducted by that institution comply with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations for the protection of human subjects in research, including, but not limited to, the Common Rule pursuant to Part 46 (commencing with Section 46.101) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, United States Food and Drug Administration regulations pursuant to Parts 50 and 56 of
 Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), and the Protection of Human Subjects in Medical Experimentation Act, Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 24170) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) The California Newborn Screening Program authorized by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 124975) of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) Tests conducted exclusively to diagnose whether an individual has a specific disease, to the extent that all persons involved in the conduct of the test maintain, use, and disclose genetic information in the same manner as medical information or protected health information, as described in paragraph (1).

(7) Genetic data used or maintained by an employer, or disclosed by an
 employee to an employer, to the extent that the use, maintenance, or disclosure of that data is necessary to comply with a local, state, or federal workplace health and safety ordinance, law, or regulation.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect access to information made available to the public by the consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56.186.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Use and Disclosure of Medical Information by Employers [56.20. - 56.245.]

56.20.

(a) Each employer who receives medical information shall establish appropriate procedures to ensure the confidentiality and protection from unauthorized use and disclosure of that information. These procedures may include, but are not limited to, instruction regarding confidentiality of employees and agents handling files containing medical information, and security systems restricting access to files containing medical information.

(b) No employee shall be discriminated against in terms or conditions of employment due to that employee’s refusal to sign an authorization
 under this part. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit an employer from taking such action as is necessary in the absence of medical information due to an employee’s refusal to sign an authorization under this part.

(c) No employer shall use, disclose, or knowingly permit its employees or agents to use or disclose medical information which the employer possesses pertaining to its employees without the patient having first signed an authorization under Section 56.11 or Section 56.21 permitting such use or disclosure, except as follows:

(1) The information may be disclosed if the disclosure is compelled by judicial or administrative process or by any other specific provision of law. 

(2) That part of the information which is relevant in a lawsuit, arbitration, grievance, or other claim or challenge to which
 the employer and employee are parties and in which the patient has placed in issue his or her medical history, mental or physical condition, or treatment may be used or disclosed in connection with that proceeding.

(3) The information may be used only for the purpose of administering and maintaining employee benefit plans, including health care plans and plans providing short-term and long-term disability income, workers’ compensation and for determining eligibility for paid and unpaid leave from work for medical reasons.

(4) The information may be disclosed to a provider of health care or other health care professional or facility to aid the diagnosis or treatment of the patient, where the patient or other person specified in subdivision (c) of Section 56. 21 is unable to authorize the disclosure.

(d) If an employer
 agrees in writing with one or more of its employees or maintains a written policy which provides that particular types of medical information shall not be used or disclosed by the employer in particular ways, the employer shall obtain an authorization for such uses or disclosures even if an authorization would not otherwise be required by subdivision (c).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.21.

An authorization for an employer to disclose medical information shall be valid if the authorization complies with all of the following:

(a) Is handwritten or is in a typeface no smaller than 14-point type.

(b) Is clearly separate from any other language present on the same page and is executed by a signature that serves no purpose other than to execute the authorization.

(c) Is signed, including with an electronic or handwritten signature, and dated by one of the following:

(1) The patient, except that a patient who is a minor may only sign an
 authorization for the disclosure of medical information obtained by a provider of health care in the course of furnishing services to which the minor could lawfully have consented under Part 4 (commencing with Section 6900) of Division 11 of the Family Code.

(2) The legal representative of the patient, if the patient is a minor or lacks the capacity to make the decision to authorize the release of medical information. However, authorization may not be given under this subdivision for the disclosure of medical information that pertains to a competent minor and that was created by a provider of health care in the course of furnishing services to which a minor patient could lawfully have consented under Part 4 (commencing with Section 6900) of Division 11 of the Family Code.

(3) The beneficiary, as defined in Section 24 of the Probate Code, or personal representative, as defined in
 Section 58 of the Probate Code, of a deceased patient.

(d) States the limitations, if any, on the types of medical information to be disclosed.

(e) States the name or functions of the employer or person authorized to disclose the medical information.

(f) States the names or functions of the persons or entities authorized to receive the medical information.

(g) States the limitations, if any, on the use of the medical information by the persons or entities authorized to receive the medical information.

(h) States an expiration date or event. The expiration date or event shall limit the duration of the authorization to one year or less, unless the person signing the authorization requests a
 specific date beyond a year or unless the authorization is related to an approved clinical trial, as defined in Section 1370.6 of the Health and Safety Code, or medical research study, in which case the authorization may extend beyond one year if the expiration date or event extends no longer than the completion of the relevant clinical trial or research study.

(i) Advises the person who signed the authorization of the right to receive a copy of the authorization.

(j) If an employer or any other entity seeks an authorization from an individual for a use or disclosure of protected health information, the employer or other entity shall provide the individual with a copy of the signed authorization and instructions on how to access additional copies or a digital version of the signed authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   (AB 1697)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56.22.

Upon demand by the patient or the person who signed an authorization, an employer possessing the authorization shall furnish a true copy thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.23.

An employer that discloses medical information pursuant to an authorization required by this chapter shall communicate to the person or entity to which it discloses the medical information any limitations in the authorization regarding the use of the medical information. No employer that has attempted in good faith to comply with this provision shall be liable for any unauthorized use of the medical information by the person or entity to which the employer disclosed the medical information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.24.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent a person who could sign the authorization pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56.21 from cancelling or modifying an authorization. However, the cancellation or modification shall be effective only after the employer actually receives written notice of the cancellation or modification.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.245.

A recipient of medical information pursuant to an authorization as provided by this chapter may not further disclose such medical information unless in accordance with a new authorization that meets the requirements of Section 56. 21, or as specifically required or permitted by other provisions of this chapter or by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Relationship of Chapters 2 and 3 [56.25. - 56.25.]

56.25.

(a) An employer that is a provider of health care shall not be deemed to have violated Section 56.20 by disclosing, in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 56.10), medical information possessed in connection with providing health care services to the provider’s patients.

(b) An employer shall not be deemed to have violated Section 56.20 because a provider of health care that is an employee or agent of the employer uses or discloses, in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 56.10), medical information possessed by the provider in connection
 with providing health care services to the provider’s patients.

(c) A provider of health care that is an employer shall not be deemed to have violated Section 56.10 by disclosing, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56.20), medical information possessed in connection with employing the provider’s employees. Information maintained by a provider of health care in connection with employing the provider’s employees shall not be deemed to be medical information for purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56.20), unless it would be deemed medical information if received or maintained by an employer that is not a provider of health care.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. Notifications [56.251. - 56.251.]

56.251.

When partnering with a provider of health care to provide a mental health digital service, any business that offers a mental health digital service shall
 provide to the provider of health care information regarding how to find data breaches reported pursuant to Section 1798.82 on the internet website of the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 690, Sec. 3.   (AB 2089)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Use and Disclosure of Medical and Other Information by Third Party Administrators and Others [56.26. - 56.265.]

56.26.

(a) No person or entity engaged in the business of furnishing administrative services to programs that provide payment for health care services shall knowingly use, disclose, or permit its employees or agents to use or disclose medical information possessed in connection with performing administrative functions for a program, except as reasonably necessary in connection with the administration or maintenance of the program, or as required by law, or with an authorization.

(b) An authorization required by this section shall be in the same form as described in Section 56.21, except that “third party administrator” shall be substituted for “employer” wherever it appears in Section 56.21.

(c) This section shall not apply to any person or entity that is subject to the Insurance Information Privacy Act or to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 56.10) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56.20).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56.265.

A person or entity that underwrites or sells annuity contracts or contracts insuring, guaranteeing, or indemnifying against loss, harm, damage, illness, disability, or death, and any affiliate of that person or entity, shall not disclose individually identifiable information concerning the health of, or the medical or genetic history of, a customer, to any affiliated or nonaffiliated depository institution, or to any other affiliated or nonaffiliated third party for use with regard to the granting of credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 278, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Relationship to Existing Law [56.27. - 56.31.]

56.27.

An employer that is an insurance institution, insurance agent, or insurance support organization subject to the Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act, Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, shall not be deemed to have violated Section 56.20 by disclosing medical information gathered in connection with an insurance transaction in accordance with that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.28.

Nothing in this part shall be deemed to affect existing laws relating to a patient’s right of access to his or her own medical information, or relating to disclosures made pursuant to Section 1158 of the Evidence Code, or relating to privileges established under the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.29.

(a) Nothing in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 shall be construed to permit the acquisition or disclosure of medical information regarding a patient without an authorization, where the authorization is required by this part.

(b) The disclosure of medical information regarding a patient which is subject to subdivision (b) of Section 1798.24 shall be made only with an authorization which complies with the provisions of this part. Such disclosure may be made only within the time limits specified in subdivision (b) of Section
 1798.24.

(c) Where the acquisition or disclosure of medical information regarding a patient is prohibited or limited by any provision of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3, the prohibition or limit shall be applicable in addition to the requirements of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.30.

The disclosure and use of the following medical information shall not be subject to the limitations of this part:

(a) (Mental health and developmental disabilities) Information and records obtained in the course of providing services under Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000), Division 4.1 (commencing with Section 4400), Division 4.5 (commencing with
 Section 4500), Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000), Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000), or Division 7 (commencing with Section 7100) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) (Public social services) Information and records that are subject to Sections 10850, 14124.1, and 14124.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) (State health services, communicable diseases, developmental disabilities) Information and records maintained pursuant to former Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code and pursuant to the Communicable Disease Prevention and Control Act (subdivision (a) of Section 27 of the Health and Safety Code).

(d) (Licensing and statistics) Information and records maintained pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) and Part 1
 (commencing with Section 102100) of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code; pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code; and pursuant to Section 8608, 8817, or 8909 of the Family Code.

(e) (Medical survey, workers’ safety) Information and records acquired and maintained or disclosed pursuant to Sections 1380 and 1382 of the Health and Safety Code and pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of the Labor Code.

(f) (Industrial accidents) Information and records acquired, maintained, or disclosed pursuant to Division 1 (commencing with Section 50), Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200), Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100), and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Labor Code.

(g) (Law enforcement) Information and
 records maintained by a health facility which are sought by a law enforcement agency under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1543) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(h) (Investigations of employment accident or illness) Information and records sought as part of an investigation of an on-the-job accident or illness pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of the Labor Code or pursuant to Section 105200 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) (Alcohol or drug abuse) Information and records subject to the federal alcohol and drug abuse regulations (Part 2 (commencing with Section 2.1) of Subchapter A of Chapter 1 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations) or to Section 11845.5 of the Health and Safety Code dealing with alcohol and drug abuse.

(j) (Patient discharge data) Nothing in this part shall
 be construed to limit, expand, or otherwise affect the authority of the California Health Facilities Commission to collect patient discharge information from health facilities.

(k) Medical information and records disclosed to, and their use by, the Insurance Commissioner, the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, the Division of Industrial Accidents, the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, the Department of Insurance, or the Department of Managed Health Care.

(l) Medical information and records related to services provided on and after January 1, 2006, disclosed to, and their use by, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board to the same extent that those records are required to be provided to the board related to services provided on and after July 1, 2009, to comply with Section 403 of the federal Children’s Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009
 (Public Law 111-3), applying subdivision (c) of Section 1932 of the federal Social Security Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 14.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

56.31.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in subdivision (f) of Section 56.30 shall permit the disclosure or use of medical information regarding whether a patient is infected with or exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus without the prior authorization from the patient unless the patient is an injured worker claiming to be infected with or exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus through an exposure incident arising out of and in the course of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Violations [56.35. - 56.37.]

56.35.

In addition to any other remedies available at law, a patient whose medical information has been used or disclosed in violation of Section 56.10, 56.104, 56.107, or 56.20 or subdivision (a) of Section 56.26 and who has sustained economic loss or personal injury therefrom may recover compensatory damages, punitive damages not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000), attorney’s fees not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the costs of litigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 190, Sec. 4.   (AB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56.36.

(a) A violation of the provisions of this part that results in economic loss or personal injury to a patient is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(b) In addition to any other remedies available at law, an individual may bring an action against a person or entity who has negligently released confidential information or records concerning him or
 her in violation of this part, for either or both of the following:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), nominal damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000). In order to recover under this paragraph, it is not necessary that the plaintiff suffered or was threatened with actual damages.

(2) The amount of actual damages, if any, sustained by the patient.

(c) (1) In addition, a person or entity that negligently discloses medical information in violation of the provisions of this part shall also be liable, irrespective of the amount of damages suffered by the patient as a result of that violation, for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.

(2) (A) A person or entity, other than a licensed health care professional, who knowingly and willfully obtains, discloses, or uses medical information in violation of this part shall be liable for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation.

(B) A licensed health care professional who knowingly and willfully obtains, discloses, or uses medical information in violation of this part shall be liable on a first violation for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, on a second violation for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, or on a third and subsequent violation for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit the liability of a
 health care service plan, a contractor, or a provider of health care that is not a licensed health care professional for a violation of this part.

(3) (A) A person or entity, other than a licensed health care professional, who knowingly or willfully obtains or uses medical information in violation of this part for the purpose of financial gain shall be liable for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per violation and shall also be subject to disgorgement of any proceeds or other consideration obtained as a result of the violation.

(B) A licensed health care professional who knowingly and willfully obtains, discloses, or uses medical information in violation of this part for financial gain shall be liable on a first violation for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed five thousand
 dollars ($5,000) per violation, on a second violation for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation, or on a third and subsequent violation for an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per violation and shall also be subject to disgorgement of any proceeds or other consideration obtained as a result of the violation. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit the liability of a health care service plan, a contractor, or a provider of health care that is not a licensed health care professional for any violation of this part.

(4) This subdivision shall not be construed as authorizing an administrative fine or civil penalty under both paragraphs (2) and (3) for the same violation.

(5) A person or entity who is not permitted to receive medical information
 pursuant to this part and who knowingly and willfully obtains, discloses, or uses medical information without written authorization from the patient shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per violation.

(d) In assessing the amount of an administrative fine or civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (c), the State Department of Public Health, licensing agency, or certifying board or court shall consider any of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Whether the defendant has made a reasonable, good faith attempt to comply with this part.

(2) The nature and seriousness of the misconduct.

(3) The harm to the patient,
 enrollee, or subscriber.

(4) The number of violations.

(5) The persistence of the misconduct.

(6) The length of time over which the misconduct occurred.

(7) The willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct.

(8) The defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(e) (1) In an action brought by an individual pursuant to subdivision (b) on or after January 1, 2013, in which the defendant establishes the affirmative defense in paragraph (2), the court shall award any actual damages and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, but shall not award nominal damages for a violation of this part.

(2) The defendant is entitled to an affirmative defense if all of the following are established, subject to the equitable considerations in paragraph (3):

(A) The defendant is a covered entity or business associate, as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, in effect as of January 1, 2012.

(B) The defendant has complied with any obligations to notify all persons entitled to receive notice regarding the release of the information or records.

(C) The release of confidential information or records was solely to another covered entity or business associate.

(D) The release of confidential information or records was not an incident of medical identity theft. For
 purposes of this subparagraph, “medical identity theft” means the use of an individual’s personal information, as defined in Section 1798.80, without the individual’s knowledge or consent, to obtain medical goods or services, or to submit false claims for medical services.

(E) The defendant took appropriate preventive actions to protect the confidential information or records against release consistent with the defendant’s obligations under this part or other applicable state law and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) (HIPAA) and all HIPAA Administrative Simplification Regulations in effect on January 1, 2012, contained in Parts 160, 162, and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and Part 2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Developing and
 implementing security policies and procedures.

(ii) Designating a security official who is responsible for developing and implementing its security policies and procedures, including educating and training the workforce.

(iii) Encrypting the information or records, and protecting against the release or use of the encryption key and passwords, or transmitting the information or records in a manner designed to provide equal or greater protections against improper disclosures.

(F) The defendant took reasonable and appropriate corrective action after the release of the confidential information or records, and the covered entity or business associate that received the confidential information or records destroyed or returned the confidential information or records in the most expedient time possible and without
 unreasonable delay, consistent with any measures necessary to determine the scope of the breach and restore the reasonable integrity of the data system. A court may consider this subparagraph to be established if the defendant shows in detail that the covered entity or business associate could not destroy or return the confidential information or records because of the technology utilized.

(G) The covered entity or business associate that received the confidential information or records, or any of its agents, independent contractors, or employees, regardless of the scope of the employee’s employment, did not retain, use, or release the information or records.

(H) After the release of the confidential information or records, the defendant took reasonable and appropriate action to prevent a future similar release of confidential information or records.

(I) The defendant has not previously established an affirmative defense pursuant to this subdivision, or the court determines, in its discretion, that application of the affirmative defense is compelling and consistent with the purposes of this section to promote reasonable conduct in light of all the facts.

(3) (A) In determining whether the affirmative defense may be established pursuant to paragraph (2), the court shall consider the equity of the situation, including, but not limited to, (i) whether the defendant has previously violated this part, regardless of whether an action has previously been brought, and (ii) the nature of the prior violation.

(B) To the extent the court allows discovery to determine whether there has been any other violation of this part that the court will consider in
 balancing the equities, the defendant shall not provide any medical information, as defined in Section 56.05. The court, in its discretion, may enter a protective order prohibiting the further use of any personal information, as defined in Section 1798.80, about the individual whose medical information may have been disclosed in a prior violation.

(4) In an action under this subdivision in which the defendant establishes the affirmative defense pursuant to paragraph (2), a plaintiff shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs without regard to an award of actual or nominal damages or the imposition of administrative fines or civil penalties.

(5) In an action brought by an individual pursuant to subdivision (b) on or after January 1, 2013, in which the defendant establishes the affirmative defense pursuant to paragraph (2), a defendant shall not be liable for
 more than one judgment on the merits under this subdivision for releases of confidential information or records arising out of the same event, transaction, or occurrence.

(f) (1) The civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California in any court of competent jurisdiction by any of the following:

(A) The Attorney General.

(B) A district attorney.

(C) A county counsel authorized by agreement with the district attorney in actions involving violation of a county ordinance.

(D) A city attorney of a city.

(E) A city attorney of a city and county having a population in excess of 750,000, with the consent of the district attorney.

(F) A city prosecutor in a city having a full-time city prosecutor or, with the consent of the district attorney, by a city attorney in a city and county.

(G) The State Public Health Officer, or his or her designee, may recommend that a person described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, bring a civil action under this section.

(2) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the
 judgment was entered. Except as provided in paragraph (3), if the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(3) If the action is brought by a city attorney of a city and county, the entire amount of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city and county in which the judgment was entered.

(4) This section shall not be construed as authorizing both an administrative fine and civil penalty for the same violation.

(5) Imposition of a fine or penalty provided for in this section shall not preclude imposition of other sanctions or remedies authorized by law.

(6) Administrative fines or penalties issued pursuant to Section 1280.15 of the Health and Safety Code shall offset any other administrative fine or civil penalty imposed under this section for the same violation.

(g) For purposes of this section, “knowing” and “willful” shall have the same meanings as in Section 7 of the Penal Code.

(h) A person who discloses protected medical information in accordance with the provisions of this part is not subject to the penalty provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 26.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

56.37.

(a) No provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor may require a patient, as a condition of receiving health care services, to sign an authorization, release, consent, or waiver that would permit the disclosure of medical information that otherwise may not be disclosed under Section 56.10 or any other provision of law. However, a health care service plan or disability insurer may require relevant enrollee or subscriber medical information as a condition of the medical underwriting process, provided that Sections 1374.7
 and 1389.1 of the Health and Safety Code are strictly observed.

(b) Any waiver by a patient of the provisions of this part, except as authorized by Section 56.11 or 56.21 or subdivision (b) of Section 56.26, shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 526, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.7. Medical Claims Data Error Correction [57. - 57.]

57.

(a) A qualified entity, as defined in Section 1395kk(e)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, that receives claims data from a health care service plan or health insurer shall comply with the requirements governing provider and supplier requests for error correction established under Section 401.717 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations for all claims data received, including data from sources other than Medicare.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Provider” means a hospital, a skilled nursing facility, a comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facility, a home health agency, a hospice, a clinic, or a rehabilitation agency.

(2) “Supplier” means a physician and surgeon or other health care practitioner, or an entity that furnishes health care services other than a provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 869, Sec. 1.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.9. CALIFORNIA FAIR DEALERSHIP LAW [80. - 86.]

80.

This part may be cited as the California Fair Dealership Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 914, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

81.

As used in this part:

(a) “Person” means a natural person, partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, or other entity.

(b) “Dealership” means a contract or agreement, either express or implied, whether oral or written, between two or more persons, by which a person is granted the right to sell or distribute goods or services, or to use a trade name, trademark, service mark, logotype, or advertising or other
 commercial symbol, in which there is a community of interest in the business of offering, selling, or distributing goods or services at wholesale, or at retail, by lease, agreement, or otherwise.

(c) “Grantor” means a person who sells, leases, or otherwise transfers a dealership.

(d) “Community of interest” means a continuing financial interest between the grantor and grantee in either the operation of the dealership or the marketing of goods or services.

(e) “Dealer” means a person who is a grantee of a dealership situated in this state.

(f) “Grant” means a sale, lease, or transfer of any kind.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

82.

This part shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies, which are as follows:

(a) The prohibition of discrimination based upon any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 in the granting, sale, transfer, bequest, termination, and nonrenewal of dealerships.

(b) The requirements of this part shall not be varied by contract or agreement and any portion of a
 contract or agreement purporting to do so is void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

83.

On or after January 1, 1981, no grantor, directly or indirectly, shall refuse to grant a dealership to any person because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

84.

On or after January 1, 1981, no grantor, directly or indirectly, may terminate, cancel, or refuse to renew a dealership agreement with a dealer because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

85.

On or after January 1, 1981, no grantor or dealer, directly or indirectly, shall refuse to make or to consent to an assignment, sale, transfer, or bequest of a dealership to any person, or to the intestate succession to the dealership by any person, because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51. This section shall not be construed to create any right in a dealer to assign, sell, transfer, or bequeath a dealership where the right did not exist prior to January 1, 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

86.

The prevailing party in any action based on a violation of the provisions of this part shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and taxable court costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 914, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. PROPERTY [654. - 1422.]



PART 1. PROPERTY IN GENERAL [654. - 749.]



  TITLE 1. NATURE OF PROPERTY [654. - 663.]

654.
